District of Columbia statutes.
16-1002

Complaint of criminal conduct.

A petitioner has a right to seek relief under this subchapter. This right does not depend on the decision of the Attorney General, the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia, or a prosecuting attorney in any jurisdiction to initiate or not to initiate a criminal or delinquency case or on the pendency or termination of a criminal or delinquency case involving the same parties or issues. Testimony of the respondent in any civil proceedings under this subchapter shall be inadmissible as evidence in a criminal trial or delinquency proceeding except in a prosecution for perjury or false statement.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 546, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 131(a)
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-144, § 3, 29 DCR 3131
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81,§ 10(j), 45 DCR 745
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-368, § 3(b)(2), 56 DCR 1338

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1002.
1973 Ed., § 16-1002.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-368 rewrote the section.